Nevada, session 83, SB31.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 533.087 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.087 1. Except for a claimant that is a Federal agency:
(a) A claimant of any vested water right must submit, on a form
prescribed by the State Engineer, proof of the claim to the State
Engineer on or before December 31, 2027.
(b) If a claimant fails to file such proof on or before
December 31, 2027, the claim shall be deemed to be abandoned.
2. Until December 31, 2027, the State Engineer shall cause
notice of the provisions of subsection 1 to be:
(a) Published annually for 4 consecutive weeks in at least one
newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of each
groundwater basin throughout the State.
(b) Posted on the Internet website maintained by the State
Engineer.
Sec. 2. NRS 533.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.095 1. As soon as practicable after the State Engineer
enters an order granting the petition or selecting the streams upon
which the determination of rights is to begin, the State Engineer
shall prepare a notice setting forth the fact of the entry of the order
and of the pendency of the proceedings.
2. The notice shall set forth:
(a) That any federal agencies claiming reserved or vested rights
in the waters of the stream system are required, as prescribed by the
State Engineer, to make proof of their claims;
(b) The date on which the State Engineer will commence taking
proofs of appropriation regarding the rights in and to the waters of
the stream system;
(c) The date by which all proofs of appropriation must be filed;
and
(d) That all proofs of appropriation must be accompanied by
maps prepared in accordance with and depicting any information
required pursuant to NRS 533.100 and 533.115.
3. The notice shall be published for a period of 4 consecutive
weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
boundaries of the stream system.
4. At or near the time of the first publication of the notice, the
State Engineer shall send by mail to each federal agency, or deliver
to each federal agency, in person, hereinafter designated as
claimant, claiming rights in or to the waters of the stream system,
-
*SB31*

– 3 –
insofar as such claimants can be reasonably ascertained, a notice
equivalent in terms to the published notice setting forth the date
when the State Engineer will commence the taking of proofs, and
the date prior to which proofs must be filed with the State Engineer.
The notice must be mailed at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for
the commencement of the taking of proofs. The date set prior to
which the proofs must be filed shall not be less than 60 days from
the date set for the commencement of taking proofs. The notice shall
be deemed to be an order of the State Engineer as to its contents.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 1 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 2 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2028.
H
-
*SB31*